District of Columbia statutes.
31-5334

Review.

All decisions and findings of the Commissioner made under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to review as provided by subchapters I and II of Chapter 2 of Title 5.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1235, 45 DCR 1172

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1264.

Prior Codifications